Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3,154
Taxicabs; registration fee.

For taxicabs, used for hire, duly licensed by the governing authorities of cities and villages, the registration fee shall be fifteen dollars.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 154.